test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-A-naaahsa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - naaáhsa - ok : # -m animate noun, my grandparent/elder AEW NA1
     naaáhsa+NAD+Px1Sg+Sg: naaáhsa
     naaáhsa+NAD+Px1Sg+Pl: naaáhsiksi
     naaáhsa+NAD+Px1Sg+Obv: naaáhsi
     naaáhsa+NAD+Px1Sg+Non: naaáhsi
     
     naaáhsa+NAD+Px1Pl+Sg: naaáhsinnaana
     naaáhsa+NAD+Px1Pl+Pl: naaáhsinnaaniksi
     naaáhsa+NAD+Px1Pl+Obv: naaáhsinnaani
     naaáhsa+NAD+Px1Pl+Non: naaáhsinnaani

     naaáhsa+NAD+Px21Pl+Sg: kaaáhsinnoona
     naaáhsa+NAD+Px21Pl+Pl: kaaáhsinnooniksi
     naaáhsa+NAD+Px21Pl+Obv: kaaáhsinnooni
     naaáhsa+NAD+Px21Pl+Non: kaaáhsinnooni

     naaáhsa+NAD+Px2Sg+Sg: kaaáhsa
     naaáhsa+NAD+Px2Sg+Pl: kaaáhsiksi
     naaáhsa+NAD+Px2Sg+Obv: kaaáhsi
     naaáhsa+NAD+Px2Sg+Non: kaaáhsi

     naaáhsa+NAD+Px3Sg+Pl: maaáhsiksi
     naaáhsa+NAD+Px3Sg+Obv: maaáhsi
     naaáhsa+NAD+Px3Sg+Non: maaáhsi

     naaáhsa+NAD+Px3Pl+Pl: maaáhsoaawaiksi
     naaáhsa+NAD+Px3Pl+Obv: maaáhsoaawayi
     naaáhsa+NAD+Px3Pl+Non: maaáhsoaawai

    
